California, session 20252026, AB788.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12838.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:12838.1. (a) There is hereby created within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, under the Undersecretary for Administration, the following divisions:(1) The Division of Enterprise Information Services, the Division of Facility Planning, Construction, and Management, and the Division of Administrative Services. Each division shall be headed by a director, who shall be appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(2) The Division of Correctional Policy Research and Internal Oversight. This division shall be headed by a director, who shall be appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(b) There is hereby created in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, under the Undersecretary for Health Care Services, the Division of Health Care Operations and the Division of Health Care Policy and Administration. Each division shall be headed by a director, who shall be appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(c) (1) There is hereby created within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, under the Undersecretary for Operations, the Division of Adult Institutions, the Division of Adult Parole Operations, the Division of Female Programs and Services, and the Division of Rehabilitative Programs. Each division shall be headed by a director, who shall be appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.(2) The Director for Female Programs and Services shall be responsible solely for female adult institutions and community facilities housing female offenders. The director shall report to the undersecretary and shall and have a minimum of five years of experience serving the female correctional population. a female correctional population in a custody setting. This position shall have policy- and fiscal-level responsibility and decisionmaking authority and shall utilize existing departmental functions for services to avoid duplication of functions and responsibilities.(d) (1) The Governor shall, upon recommendation of the secretary, appoint three subordinate officers, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Each subordinate officer appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall oversee an identified category of male adult institutions.(2) The Governor shall, upon recommendation of the secretary, appoint one subordinate officer, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The subordinate officer appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall oversee female adult institutions.(e) (1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, whenever the term “Chief Deputy Secretary for Adult Operations” appears in any statute, regulation, or contract, it shall be construed to refer to the Director of the Division of Adult Institutions.(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, whenever the term “Chief Deputy Secretary for Adult Programs” appears in any statute, regulation, or contract, it shall be construed to refer to the Director of the Division of Rehabilitative Programs.SEC. 2. Section 3430 of the Penal Code is amended to read:3430. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do all of the following:(a) (1) Create a Female Offender Reform Master Plan, and shall present this plan to the Legislature by March 1, 2008.(2) No later than March 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on the implementation of the plan described in paragraph (1), including updated statistics contained in the plan. These reports shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) Maintain the plan, including all subsequent updates and reports, in consultation with the Gender Responsive Strategies Commission and with nationally recognized experts in gender responsive prison operational practices, staffing, classification, substance abuse, trauma treatment services, mental health services, transitional services, and community corrections. community corrections, legal advocacy, and incarceration reform.(4) Post the plan, any reports, and any updates to the plan to the department’s internet website.(b) Create policies, programs, and operational practices that are designed to ensure a safe and productive institutional environment for female offenders.(c) Contract with nationally recognized gender-responsive experts in prison operational practices staffing, classification, substance abuse, trauma treatment services, mental health services, transitional services, and community corrections to do all of the following:(1) (A) Conduct a staffing analysis of all current job classifications assigned to each prison that houses females. The department shall provide a plan to the Legislature by March 1, 2009, that incorporates those recommendations and details the changes that are needed to address any identified unmet needs of female inmates.(B) No later than March 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature the updated staffing analysis described in subparagraph (A). These reports shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Develop programs and training for department staff in correctional facilities to include not less than one week of training at the academy and annual training specifically focused on working with a female population. training at the academy and, for those working in a female prison, 40 hours of initial training with a curriculum specifically focused on working with the population within female institutions and an 8-hour annual training thereafter.(3) Perform a comprehensive review of office’s policies and practices and other aspects of women-centered corrections developed to enhance safety and rehabilitative efforts. This review should engage collaboratively with internal experts, community-based organizations, medical and mental health experts, labor, incarceration reform advocates, and national consultants on best practices to improve all aspects of operational practice and treatment, with an emphasis on sexual safety and gender-responsive, trauma-informed principles.(d) Create a gender-responsive female classification system.(e) Create a gender-responsive staffing pattern for female institutions and community-based offender beds.(f) Create a needs-based case and risk management tool designed specifically for female offenders. This tool shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment upon intake, and annually thereafter, that gauges an inmate’s educational and vocational needs, including reading, writing, communication, and arithmetic skills, health care needs, mental health needs, substance abuse needs, and trauma-treatment needs. The initial assessment shall include projections for academic, vocational, health care, mental health, substance abuse, and trauma-treatment needs, and shall be used to determine appropriate programming and as a measure of progress in subsequent assessments of development.(g) Design and implement evidence-based gender specific rehabilitative programs, including “wraparound” educational, health care, mental health, vocational, substance abuse, and trauma treatment programs that are designed to reduce female offender recidivism. These programs shall include, but not be limited to, educational programs that include academic preparation in the areas of verbal communication skills, reading, writing, arithmetic, and the acquisition of high school diplomas and GEDs, and vocational preparation, including counseling and training in marketable skills, and job placement information.(h) Build and strengthen systems of family support and family involvement during the period of the female’s incarceration.(i) Establish a family service coordinator at each prison that houses only females.SEC. 3. Section 3431 is added to the Penal Code, immediately following Section 3430, to read:3431. (a) The Division of Female Programs and Services shall do both of the following:(1) Manage and provide oversight of adult female programs, including prisons, conservation camps, and parole and community programs.(2) Develop gender-responsive, trauma-informed, culturally sensitive approaches to program and policy development that will improve recidivism outcomes for the adult incarcerated and paroled female offenders under the supervision of the department.(b) The office shall be headed by a person who has relevant professional experience in planning and implementing recidivism reduction programs and services that are gender responsive and trauma informed.SEC. 4. Section 3432 is added to the Penal Code, immediately following Section 3431, to read:3432. (a) The department shall establish the Gender Responsive Strategies Commission to develop active partnerships, involving the community, treatment experts, and related agencies in its efforts toward gender-responsive practice.(b) The commission shall be composed of representatives of community-based organizations, expert researchers, policy experts, legislators, union representatives, and formerly incarcerated women. formerly incarcerated women, legal advocates, and incarceration reform advocates. (c) The commission shall meet quarterly and publish minutes for each meeting on the department’s internet website.SEC. 5. Section 5066 of the Penal Code is amended to read:5066. The Undersecretary for Operations shall expand the existing prison ombudsperson program to ensure the comprehensive deployment of ombudspersons throughout the state prison system with specific focus on the maximum security institutions. The Undersecretary for Operations shall appoint an ombudsperson solely assigned to adult female institutions.